California statutes. Business and Professions Code
An on-sale licensee shall not knowingly employ any person to manage, direct, or conduct the business who does not have the qualifications required of a holder of the license. Any on-sale licensee requesting the department to make a determination of qualifications of a proposed manager shall submit with an application for such services a fee of one hundred forty dollars ($140), which shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761. This fee may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 35.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23789.

(a) The department is specifically authorized to refuse the issuance, other than renewal or ownership transfer, of any retail license for premises located within the immediate vicinity of churches and hospitals.

(b) The department is specifically authorized to refuse the issuance, other than renewal or ownership transfer, of any retail license for premises located within at least 600 feet of schools and public playgrounds or nonprofit youth facilities, including, but not limited to, facilities serving Girl Scouts, Boy Scouts, or Campfire Girls. This distance shall be measured pursuant to rules of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 678, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

23790.

No retail license shall be issued for any premises which are located in any territory where the exercise of the rights and privileges conferred by the license is contrary to a valid zoning ordinance of any county or city. Premises which had been used in the exercise of those rights and privileges at a time prior to the effective date of the zoning ordinance may continue operation under the following conditions:

(a) The premises retain the same type of retail liquor license within a license classification.

(b) The licensed premises are operated continuously without substantial change in mode or character of operation.

For purposes of this subdivision, a break in continuous operation does not include:

(1) A closure for not more than 30 days for purposes of repair, if that repair does not change the nature of the licensed premises and does not increase the square footage of the business used for the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(2) The closure for restoration of premises rendered totally or partially inaccessible by an act of God or a toxic accident, if the restoration does not increase the square footage of the business used for the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23790.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to ensure that local government shall not be preempted in the valid exercise of its land use authority pursuant to Section 23790, including, but not limited to, enacting an ordinance requiring a conditional use permit. It is also the intent of the Legislature to prevent the legislated prohibition of the concurrent retailing of beer and wine for off-premises consumption and motor vehicle fuel where the retailing of each is otherwise allowable. 

(b) (1) No city, county, or city and county shall, by ordinance or resolution adopted on or after January 1, 1988, legislatively prohibit the concurrent retailing of motor vehicle fuel and beer and wine for off-sale consumption in zoning districts where the zoning ordinance allows motor vehicle fuel and off-sale beer and wine to be retailed on separate sites.

(2) On and after January 1, 1989, no city, county, or city and county ordinance or resolution adopted prior to May 5, 1987, shall have legal effect if it legislatively prohibits the concurrent retailing of motor vehicle fuel with beer and wine for off-sale consumption in zoning districts where the zoning ordinance allows beer and wine and motor vehicle fuel to be retailed on separate sites. 

(3) On and after July 1, 1988, no city, county, or city and county ordinance or resolution adopted on or after May 5, 1987, shall have legal effect if it legislatively prohibits the concurrent retailing of motor vehicle fuel with beer and wine for off-sale consumption in zoning districts where the zoning ordinance allows beer and wine and motor vehicle fuel to be retailed on separate sites. 

(4) This section shall not apply to a prohibition by a city, county, or city and county of the sale of beer and wine in conjunction with the sale of motor vehicle fuel if that prohibition occurs as a result of the prohibition of the combining of the sale of motor vehicle fuel with a broader class of products or uses which includes alcoholic beverages or beer and wine as a named or unnamed part of that larger class, if that prohibition was enacted before August 1, 1985. 

(c) Subject to the restrictions and limitations of subdivision (b), this section shall not prevent a city, county, or city and county from denying permission, or granting conditional permission, to an individual applicant to engage in the concurrent retailing of motor vehicle fuel with beer and wine for off-premises consumption pursuant to a valid conditional use permit ordinance based on appropriate health, safety, or general welfare standards contained in the ordinance if that conditional use permit ordinance contains all of the following:

(1) A requirement for written findings. 

(2) A provision for an administrative appeal if the governing body has delegated its power to issue or deny a conditional use permit. 

(3) Procedures for notice of a hearing, conduct of a hearing, and an opportunity for all parties to present testimony. 

(4) A requirement that the findings be based on substantial evidence in view of the whole record to justify the ultimate decision. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, establishments engaged in the concurrent sale of motor vehicle fuel with beer and wine for off-premises consumption shall abide by the following conditions:

(1) No beer or wine shall be displayed within five feet of the cash register or the front door unless it is in a permanently affixed cooler as of January 1, 1988.

(2) No advertisement of alcoholic beverages shall be displayed at motor fuel islands. 

(3) No sale of alcoholic beverages shall be made from a drive-in window.

(4) No display or sale of beer or wine shall be made from an ice tub. 

(5) No beer or wine advertising shall be located on motor fuel islands and no self-illuminated advertising for beer or wine shall be located on buildings or windows. 

(6) Employees on duty between the hours of 10 p.m. and 2 a.m. who sell beer or wine shall be at least 21 years of age.

The standards contained in this subdivision are minimum state standards which do not limit local regulation otherwise permitted under this section.

(e) If there is a finding that a licensee or his or her employee has sold any alcoholic beverages to a minor at an establishment engaged in the concurrent sale of motor vehicle fuel with beer and wine for off-premises consumption, the alcoholic beverage license at the establishment shall be suspended for a minimum period of 72 hours. For purposes of Section 23790, the effect of such a license suspension shall not constitute a break in the continuous operation of the establishment nor a substantial change in the mode or character of operation.

(f) The provisions of this section apply to charter cities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 627, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

23791.

Nothing in this division interferes with the powers of cities conferred upon them by Sections 65850 to 65861, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 232.)
-------------------------------------------

23793.

No new original public premises licenses shall be issued except for beer, or beer and wine, and no public premises licenses shall be transferred from county to county, unless the applicant can show that substantial public demand cannot otherwise be satisfied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 425.)
-------------------------------------------

23794.

A license shall not be issued to any applicant to authorize the manufacture, distribution, or retail sale of powdered alcohol.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 742, Sec. 4.   (AB 1554)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Conditional Licenses [23800. - 23805.]

23800.

The department may place reasonable conditions upon retail licensees or upon any licensee in the exercise of retail privileges in the following situations:

(a) If grounds exist for the denial of an application for a license or where a protest against the issuance of a license is filed and if the department finds that those grounds may be removed by the imposition of those conditions.

(b) Where findings are made by the department which would justify a suspension or revocation of a license, and where the imposition of a condition is reasonably related to those findings. In the case of a suspension, the conditions may be in lieu of or in addition to the suspension.

(c) Where the department issues an order suspending or revoking only a portion of the privileges to be exercised under the license.

(d) Where findings are made by the department that the licensee has failed to correct objectionable conditions within a reasonable time after receipt of notice to make corrections given pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 24200, or subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 24200.1.

(e) (1) At the time of transfer of a license pursuant to Section 24070, 24071.1, or 24071.2, and upon written notice to the licensee, the department may adopt conditions that the department determines are reasonable pursuant to its investigation or that are requested by the local governing body, or its designated subordinate officer or agency, in whose jurisdiction the license is located. The request for conditions shall be supported by
 substantial evidence that the problems either on the premises or in the immediate vicinity identified by the local governing body or its designated subordinate officer or agency will be mitigated by the conditions. Upon receipt of the request for conditions, the department shall either adopt the conditions requested or notify the local governing body, or its designated subordinate officer or agency, in writing of its determination that there is not substantial evidence that the problem exists or that the conditions would not mitigate the problems identified. The department may adopt conditions only when the request is filed. Any request for conditions from the local governing body or its designated subordinate officer or agency pursuant to this provision shall be filed with the department within the time authorized for a local law enforcement agency to file a protest or proposed conditions pursuant to Section 23987.

(2) If the license to be
 transferred subject to paragraph (1) is located in an area of undue concentration as defined in Section 23958.4, the period within which the local governing body or its designated subordinate officer or agency may submit a written request for conditions shall be 40 days after the mailing of the notices required by Section 23987. For purposes of this provision only, undue concentration shall be established when the requirements of both paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and either paragraph (2) or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 23958.4 exist. Pursuant to Section 23987, the department may extend the 40-day period for a period not to exceed an additional 20 days upon the written request of any local law enforcement agency or local government entity with jurisdiction. Nothing in this paragraph is intended to reduce the burden of the local governing body or its designated subordinate officer or agency to support any request for conditions as required by paragraph (1). Notwithstanding Section 23987, the
 department may not transfer any license subject to this paragraph until after the time period permitted to request conditions as specified in this paragraph.

(f) At the time of a transfer of a license pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 24070) of Chapter 6.

(g) At the time any physical changes or alterations are made to the licensed premises, subject to approval by the department, that materially or substantially alter the premises or the usage of the premises from the plan contained in the diagram of licensed premises on file with the license application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 362, Sec. 1.   (SB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23801.

The conditions authorized by Section 23800 may cover any matter relating to the privileges to be exercised under the license, the personal qualifications of the licensee, the conduct of the business or the condition of the premises, which will protect the public welfare and morals, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) Restrictions as to hours of sale.

(b) Display of signs.

(c) Employment of designated persons.

(d) Types and strengths of alcoholic beverages to be served where such types or strengths are otherwise limited by law.

(e) In cases under subdivision (c) of Section 23800, the portion of the privileges to be exercised under the license.

(f) The personal conduct of the licensee.

(g) In cases under subdivision (f) of Section 23800, restrictions on the presence of the license transferor on the licensed premises without lawful business if that license transferor has multiple violations of this division when in possession of the license. For purposes of this section, “lawful business” specifically excludes, without limitation, working or volunteering at the premises, consulting with the licensee regarding the operation of the premises, and loitering.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 254, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

23802.

Such conditions shall be endorsed upon the license and any renewal thereof and shall be binding upon all persons to whom the license is transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1351.)
-------------------------------------------

23803.

(a) The department, upon its own motion or upon the petition of a licensee or a transferee who has filed an application for the transfer of the license, if it is satisfied that the grounds that caused the imposition of the conditions no longer exist, shall order their removal or modification, provided written notice is given to the local governing body of the area in which the premises are located. The local governing body has 30 days to file written objections to the removal or modification of any condition. The department may not remove or modify any condition to which an objection has been filed without holding a hearing as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) For purposes of this
 section, a situation in which the “grounds that caused the imposition of the conditions no longer exist” includes, but is not limited to, the situation in which there have been substantial changes in the totality of circumstances such that the department determines that the current circumstances reasonably justify the modification or removal of the conditions.

(c) Any petition for the removal or modification of a condition pursuant to this section shall be accompanied by a fee of four hundred seventy-five dollars ($475). This fee may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 36.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23804.

A violation of a condition placed upon a license pursuant to this article shall constitute the exercising of a privilege or the performing of an act for which a license is required without the authority thereof and shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of such license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1351.)
-------------------------------------------

23805.

The proceedings specified in Section 23800(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) shall be conducted in the same manner as is required for other proceedings involving petitions, protests or accusations, and the right of a respondent in the proceedings to appeal shall include the right to appeal from an order imposing conditions upon the licenses involved in the proceedings. If the department gives notice of conditions pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 23800 or denies a petition filed under Section 23803, the licensee or transferee may, within 10 days after the mailing of the denial, make a written request for a hearing. The proceedings at the hearing shall be conducted as provided in Section 24300, and the respondent shall have the same rights of appeal therefrom as in disciplinary actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 499, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Limitation on Number of Licensed Premises [23815. - 23827.]

23815.

It is hereby determined that the public welfare and morals require that there be a limitation on the number of premises licensed for the sale of distilled spirits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23816.

The number of premises for which an onsale general license is issued shall be limited to one for each 2,000, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the county in which the premises are situated. No additional onsale general licenses, other than a renewal or transfer or as permitted by Section 23821, shall be issued in any county where the number of all premises for which onsale general licenses are issued is more than one for each 2,000, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the county. No onsale general license shall be issued in lieu of or upon the cancellation or surrender of an onsale beer and wine license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

23817.

Until July 1, 1963, the number of premises for which an offsale general license is issued shall be limited to one for each 2,000, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the county in which the premises are situated; and no additional offsale general license, other than a renewal or transfer or as permitted by Section 23821, shall be issued in any county where the number of premises for which all offsale general licenses are issued is more than one for each 2,000, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the county.

On and after July 1, 1963, the number of premises for which an offsale general license is issued shall be limited to one for each 2,500, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the county in which the premises are situated; and no additional offsale general license, other than a renewal or transfer or as permitted by Section 23821, shall be issued in any county where the number of premises for which all offsale general licenses are issued is more than one for each 2,500, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 783.)
-------------------------------------------

23817.4.

The Legislature finds and declares that the public welfare and morals require that there be a limitation on the number of premises licensed for the off sale of beer and wine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 564, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23817.5.

(a) (1) The number of premises for which an off-sale beer and wine license is issued shall be limited to one for each 2,500, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the city or county in which the premises are situated. No additional off-sale beer and wine license, other than a renewal or transfer or as permitted by Section 23821, shall be issued in any city or county where the number of premises for which all off-sale beer and wine licenses are issued is more than one for each 2,500, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the city or county.

(2) The number of premises for which an off-sale beer and wine license is issued in a city and county, in combination with the number of premises for which an off-sale general license is issued in a city and
 county, shall be limited to one for each 1,250, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the city and county in which the premises are situated. No additional off-sale beer and wine license, other than a renewal or transfer or as permitted by Section 23821, shall be issued in any city and county where the number of premises for which all off-sale beer and wine licenses in combination with off-sale general licenses are issued is more than one for each 1,250, or fraction thereof, inhabitants of the city and county.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a retail off-sale beer and wine replacement license may be issued at a premises that was operated under an existing off-sale beer and wine license no less than 90 days prior to the date of application for the replacement license, provided that the existing licensee is subject to a bankruptcy proceeding and the existing licensee has no right to operate at the premises, or has
 abandoned the premises of that license.

(2) A replacement license shall not be issued if the existing license has been, or is in the process of being, transferred, or if the existing license has been canceled by the licensee or surrendered by the licensee pursuant to department rule.

(3) An application for a replacement license shall be accompanied by a fee equivalent to the application fee for a retail package off-sale beer and wine license and all conditions imposed upon the existing off-sale beer and wine license at the premises shall be imposed upon the replacement license.

(4) Upon issuance of the replacement license, the off-sale beer and wine license existing at the premises shall be canceled by operation of law. A replacement license shall not be transferred to another
 premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 37.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23817.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 23817.5, the department may approve an application for an off-sale beer and wine license in areas covered by Section 23817.5, if the applicant shows that public convenience or necessity would be served by the issuance, and where all of the following conditions are found to exist:

(1) The applicant premises are located in a crime reporting district that is below that specified pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 23958.4. In considering an application, the department may take into account adjacent crime reporting districts, if the applicant premises are located within 100 feet of the boundaries of any adjacent district. The department shall use an average of reported crimes in the crime reporting district in which the premises are located and reported crimes in any adjacent crime reporting district, if the total of crimes reported in the adjacent district or districts is greater than the crime reporting district in which the premises are located.

(2) The applicant premises are located in an area that falls below the concentration level provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 23958.4.

(3) The local governing body of the area in which the applicant premises are located, or its designated subordinate officer or body, determines that public convenience or necessity would be served by the issuance.

(b) The department may impose reasonable conditions on a licensee as may be needed in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare regarding signing, training for responsible beverage sales and hours, and mode of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 931, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

23817.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 23817.5, the department may approve an application for an off-sale beer and wine license by a licensed beer and wine wholesaler, even though the applicant premises will be located in an area having an undue concentration of off-sale beer and wine licenses, as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 23958.4, provided each of the following conditions are met:

(1) The off-sale beer and wine license shall be held at the same location as the beer and wine wholesaler license.

(2) The off-sale beer and wine license shall be restricted to sales solicited and accepted by direct mail, telephone, or on-line computer. The off-sale beer and wine license shall not be used for operations conducted from a retail store open to the public.

(b) The department may impose reasonable conditions on a licensee as may be needed in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare regarding signing, training for responsible beverage sales, hours, and mode of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 564, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23817.9.

For the purposes of Section 23817.5, beginning with the year 2000, population shall be determined by the most recent United States decennial census or a single subsequent census between United States decennial censuses validated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance five years after a United States decennial census.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 38.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23817.10.

Whenever it is made to appear to the department by satisfactory evidence that the population in any city or county has increased by more than 2,500 or multiples of 2,500 inhabitants or the population in a city and county has increased by more than 1,250 or multiples of 1,250 inhabitants since the most recent United States decennial census and if the total number of off-sale beer and wine licenses in that city, county, or city and county does not then exceed the maximum specified in Section 23817.5, the department may issue additional licenses, not to exceed one off-sale beer and wine license for each increase of 2,500 inhabitants in the city or county or for each increase of 1,250 inhabitants in the city and county since the taking of the census.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 564, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23818.

Population, for the purpose of Sections 23816 and 23817, shall be determined by the most recent United States decennial or special census or a subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 39.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23819.

Nothing in this article authorizes the cancellation of any license which may be outstanding in any county in excess of the number authorized by the ratio established in this article, nor shall anything in this article require the issuance of any license in any county because the number of the licenses does not equal the authorized ratio.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23820.

The department may make all rules consistent with the provisions of Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution, or the provisions of this division, necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this article, and to restrict the issuance of alcoholic beverage licenses, including seasonal licenses, but not including beer, beer and wine wholesaler’s, and winegrower’s licenses, to a number in any county as the department shall determine is in the interest of public welfare and morals, convenience, or necessity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 564, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

23821.

Whenever it is made to appear to the department by satisfactory evidence that the population in any county has increased by more than 2,000 or multiples of 2,000 inhabitants since the most recent United States decennial or special census, and it appears to the department that by reason thereof the inhabitants of the county are unjustly and unfairly discriminated against, and if the total number of on-sale general licenses in such county do not then exceed the maximum specified in Section 23816, the department, subject to the limitation contained in Section 24070, may issue not to exceed one on-sale general license for each increase of 2,000 inhabitants in the county since the taking of the census.

Whenever it is made to appear to the department by satisfactory evidence that the population in any county has increased by more than 2,500 or multiples of 2,500 inhabitants since the most recent United States decennial or special census and it appears to the department that by reason thereof the inhabitants of the county are unjustly and unfairly discriminated against, and if the total number of off-sale general licenses in such county do not then exceed the maximum specified in Section 23817, the department, subject to the limitation contained in Section 24070, may issue not to exceed one off-sale general license for each increase of 2,500 inhabitants in the county since the taking of the census.

Before any applications for new original on-sale general or new original off-sale general or intercounty transfer of off-sale general or on-sale general licenses are accepted, the department shall publish pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the county where such new original licenses may be issued or into which off-sale general or on-sale general licenses may be transferred, notice of the department’s intention to receive applications for the issuance of such new original licenses or for the intercounty transfer of off-sale general or on-sale general licenses, setting forth the date, time, manner and place of acceptance of such applications within the county. In all other respects the limitation hereinbefore provided for shall continue in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1466.)
-------------------------------------------

23824.

(a) (1) Limitations provided by Section 23816 on the number of licensed premises shall not apply to premises located on land owned by and leased from the State of California, or to premises owned by the State of California, any incorporated city, county, city and county, airport district, or other district or public corporation of the State of California or to premises leased to the State of California or to any city or county, so long as the premises are operated as a bona fide public eating place, provided, however, that civic auditoriums owned by any incorporated city, county, city and county, or other district or any premises leased to the State of California or to any county or city for use as a civic auditorium and directly
 operated by a public entity shall be subject to the limitations provided by Section 23816, but shall not be required to be operated as a bona fide public eating place. The civic auditorium shall further not be subject to the provisions of Section 23793.

(2) An on-sale general bona fide eating place license issued pursuant to paragraph (1) for premises located on land owned by the County of Riverside and operated as the Riverside County Fairgrounds shall not be required to comply with Section 23038, except that food service shall be available to the public at all times during which the privileges of the license are being exercised.

(b) Licenses issued on premises owned by the state, incorporated city, county, city and county, airport district, or other district or public
 corporation of the State of California, or issued on premises leased to the State of California or to any county or city, shall be renewable as set forth in Section 24048. These licenses shall be excluded from the number of premises used in determining application of the limitations provided by this article. These licenses shall only be transferable from person to person at the same premises. Prior to the issuance of these licenses, the governmental agency owning or leasing the premises shall file with the department a written request that the license be issued and a written statement setting forth the reasons why issuance of the license would be in the public interest.

(c) A written request filed with the department by the governmental agency owning or the city or county leasing premises used as a civic auditorium and directly operated
 as a public entity that the license be issued need not contain a written statement setting forth the reasons why issuance of the license would be in the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (SB 1224)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23824.1.

(a) The provisions of Section 23824 shall apply to convention centers and event centers which are operated by municipal, independent nonprofit agencies for the purpose of providing meeting rooms, exhibit space, or event and theatrical seating, or all of these.

(b) Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued only upon condition that all revenues generated from the license shall be segregated and allocated for the operations and capital requirements of the convention center or event center only.

(c) For purposes of this section, “event center” means a community center, activity center, auditorium, convention center, arena, or other building, collection of buildings, or facility which is used exclusively or primarily for the holding of exhibitions, conventions, meetings, spectacles, concerts, or shows.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

23825.

As used in this article, “onsale general license” includes a special onsale general license; provided, that the limitation prescribed in Section 23816 shall not prohibit the exchange of an onsale general license for a special onsale general license, or the exchange of a special onsale general license for an onsale general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 785.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county where the inhabitants number less than 2,500 and where on July 1 of any calendar year there exists in any such county none or only one on-sale general license and none or only one off-sale general license the department may issue one additional original on-sale general license and one additional original off-sale general license during the following 12-month period.

In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred from one county to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.2.

No new off-sale beer and wine license shall be issued in a county of the first class, as specified in Section 28022 of the Government Code, unless it is issued with conditions, pursuant to Sections 23800 and 23801, which provide that the sale of products other than beer and wine on an annual basis, measured by gross receipts, shall exceed the annual sales of beer and wine products measured by the same basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 793, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county of the 58th class, the department may issue three additional original off-sale general licenses.

In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred from one county to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 407.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county where the inhabitants number less than 5,000 but more than 3,000 according to the 1970 federal census and where the major economy of that county is dependent upon the year-round use of that county’s recreational facilities the department may issue five additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. Any premises to qualify for a license under this section shall have a seating capacity for 100 or more diners. In no event shall more than five such licenses be issued under this section.

In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person who currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 571.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may authorize the conversion of any on-sale general license for seasonal business to an on-sale general license if the on-sale general license for seasonal business was originally issued before May 1, 1982, or if an application for original issuance of that license was filed before May 1, 1982, or, in the case of any county of the 34th class, if the on-sale general license for seasonal business was originally issued before October 1, 1982, or if an application for original issuance of that license was filed before October 1, 1982. An application for conversion shall be accompanied by the fee for the on-sale general licenses specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 23320. The department shall
 not accept any applications for original issuance of an on-sale general license for seasonal business on or after January 1, 1983.

(b) An on-sale general license for seasonal business which is converted to an on-sale general license under this section may not be transferred for a period of two years from the date of issuance, except as provided in Section 24071, and except when the department determines that the transfer is necessary to prevent undue hardship. The purchase price or consideration that may be paid by a transferee or received by a transferor of an on-sale general license created by conversion under this section shall not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000), except that after a period of five years from the date of issuance of the license there shall be no restriction as to the purchase price or consideration that may be paid by a transferee or received by a transferor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 41.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.9.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county of the 56th class, the department may issue 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. Any premises to qualify for a license under this section shall have a seating capacity for 50 or more diners. In no event shall more than 10 on-sale general licenses for bona fide eating places be issued under this section.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.
